Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 82.
[OBLIGATION BONDS FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT].

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 82, § 2: Jan. 1, 2005.

§ 1. Issuance of general obligation bonds.

In order for the State of Arkansas to effectively compete for large economic development projects, the Arkansas General Assembly, meeting in special or regular session, may authorize the Arkansas Development Finance Authority to issue general obligation bonds to finance infrastructure or other needs to attract large economic development projects.

Infrastructure needs may include, but are not limited to:

Land acquisition;

Site preparation;

Road and highway improvements;

Rail spur, railroad, and railport construction;

Water service;

Wastewater treatment;

Employee training which may include equipment for such purpose;

Environmental mitigation or reclamation; and

Training and research facilities and the necessary equipment therefore.

The General Assembly may authorize the issuance of bonds bearing the full faith and credit of the State of Arkansas if the prospective employer planning an economic development project is eligible under criteria established by law.

The bonds shall be paid for in full by general or special revenues appropriated by the General Assembly until the bonds have been retired and all obligations associated with the issuance of the bonds have been met.

Bonds may be issued under this amendment pursuant to an act of the General Assembly without voter approval. [As amended by Const. Amend. 90; Const. Amend. 97.]

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by H.J.R. 1028 during the 2003 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2004 general election by a vote of 612,277 for and 349,518 against.

Ark. Const. Amend. 90, which amended subsection (d), was proposed by H.J.R. 1007 during the 2009 Regular Session and was adopted at the 2010 general election by a vote of 431,724 for and 260,735 against.

Before the amendment, subsection (d) read: “In order for the General Assembly to authorize the issuance of bonds bearing the full faith and credit of the State of Arkansas, the prospective employer must be planning an economic development project that will invest more than five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) in capital expenditures and plan on hiring over five hundred (500) new employees.”

Ark. Const. Amend. 97, which amended this amendment, was proposed by S.J.R. 16 during the 2015 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2016 general election by a vote of 689,980 for and 366,020 against. The amendment deleted former (b) and redesignated former (c) through (f) as (b) through (e), inserted “railroad, and railport” in (b)(4), redesignated part of former (b)(4) as (b)(5), and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly, and inserted “or reclamation” in (b)(8).

Ark. Const. Amend. 97 was effective thirty days after the election pursuant to § 7-9-119.

Amend. 97, § 1, provided: “INTENT. The intent of this amendment to the Arkansas Constitution is to encourage job creation, job expansion, and economic development.”

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.